Utah statutes.
63M-1-2909.   Issuance of tax credit certificates.

(1)  For a tax credit applicant that seeks to claim a tax credit, the office may issue a tax credit certificate to the tax credit applicant:

(a)  for the first taxable year for which the tax credit applicant qualifies for the tax credit and enters into an agreement with the office;

(b)  for two taxable years immediately following the taxable year described in Subsection (1)(a); and

(c)  for the seven taxable years immediately following the last of the two taxable years described in Subsection (1)(b) if:

(i)  the agreement with the office described in Section 63M-1-2908 includes a provision that the tax credit applicant will make new capital expenditures of at least $1,000,000,000 in the state; and

(ii)  the tax credit applicant makes new capital expenditures of at least $1,000,000,000 in the state in accordance with the agreement with the office described in Section 63M-1-2908.

(2)  The office shall provide a duplicate copy of each tax credit certificate to the State Tax Commission.

